Washington statutes.
RCW 2.42.140

Intermediary interpreter, when.

If the communication mode or language of the hearing impaired person is not readily interpretable, the interpreter or hearing impaired person shall notify the appointing authority who shall appoint and pay an intermediary interpreter to assist the qualified interpreter.

[ 1985 c 389 s 14.]